Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2637
Commercial and noncommercial licenses; classification; testing; Cooperative Extension Service; conduct training sessions.

(1) The department may classify commercial and noncommercial licenses under subcategories within categories according to the subject, method, or place of pesticide application.

(2) The director shall establish separate testing requirements for certification and licensing in each category for which the department is responsible and may establish separate testing requirements for licensing in subcategories within a category. All written examinations for certification shall be the property of the department. Any person taking such an examination shall return the examination to the director's authorized agent prior to leaving the examination site.

(3) The Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Nebraska, through its county extension educators and specialists in the State of Nebraska, shall conduct training sessions on the use of restricted-use pesticides for private, commercial, and noncommercial applicators. The programs shall be directed toward thorough comprehension and knowledge on the safe use of restricted-use pesticides. The Cooperative Extension Service shall schedule regular and frequent training sessions and shall issue recommendations to the director of satisfactory training for private, commercial, and noncommercial applicators completing the training.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 16;

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 10.